Hawaii statutes.
§437B-7.5 Requirements for licensing
of repair dealer; inspection. (a) Before a motor vehicle repair
dealer license is granted by the board, the applicant shall establish that the
applicant is or employs a full-time motor vehicle mechanic licensed with the
board, and has a repair facility and the equipment necessary to properly
perform work in the specialty or area of certification for which licensure is
requested.

(b) The board may inspect an applicant's
repair facility and equipment prior to licensing, and may conduct subsequent
inspections of repair facilities to verify continued compliance with subsection
(a). [L 1993, c 110, §1; am L 1998, c 199, §5]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next